Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.152

Solid waste handling—Agreements—Purposes—Terms and conditions.

A city or town may construct, lease, condemn, purchase, acquire, add to, alter, and extend systems, plants, sites, or other facilities for solid waste handling, and shall have full jurisdiction and authority to manage, regulate, maintain, utilize, operate, control, and establish the rates and charges for those solid waste handling systems, plants, sites, or other facilities owned or operated by the city or town. A city or town may enter into agreements with public or private parties to: (1) Construct, lease, purchase, acquire, manage, maintain, utilize, or operate publicly or privately owned or operated solid waste handling systems, plants, sites, or other facilities; (2) establish rates and charges for those systems, plants, sites, or other facilities; (3) designate particular publicly or privately owned or operated systems, plants, sites, or other facilities as disposal sites; and (4) sell the materials or products of those systems, plants, or other facilities. Any agreement entered into shall be for such term and under such conditions as may be determined by the legislative authority of the city or town.

[ 1989 c 399 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 164 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 208 s 1.]